Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

General

48-248-101. Applicability.

Chapters 201-248 of this title apply to professional limited liability companies, both domestic and foreign, to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Any health care professionals possessing a statutory right to form and become members of the same professional corporation or professional limited liability company, respectively, may serve as officers and directors of that professional corporation, or as governors or managers of that professional limited liability company, OAG 03-010, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/24/03).

48-248-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Disqualified person” means an individual or entity that for any reason is or becomes ineligible under this chapter to be a member of a PLLC;

“Domestic professional LLC” means a professional LLC formed under chapters 201-248 of this title;

“Foreign professional LLC” means a foreign LLC formed for the purpose of rendering professional services under a law other than the law of this state;

“Law” includes rules promulgated in accordance with § 48-248-603;

“Licensing authority” means the officer, board, agency, court or other authority in this state empowered to license or otherwise authorize the rendition of a professional service;

“Professional LLC” or “PLLC” means an LLC, other than a foreign professional LLC, which has elected to become subject to this chapter;

“Professional service” means a service that may be lawfully rendered only by a person licensed or otherwise authorized by a licensing authority in this state to render the service and that may not be lawfully rendered by a corporation under the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in chapters 11-27 of this title or by an LLC under chapters 201-248 of this title; and

“Qualified person” means an individual, general partnership, professional corporation, professional association or PLLC that is eligible under § 48-248-401 to be a member of a PLLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 89.

Law Reviews.

Punitive Damages and Business Organizations: A Pathetic Fallacy, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 971 (2000).

48-248-103. Formation.

One (1) or more persons acting as organizers may form a PLLC by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles that also state it is a PLLC; its purpose is to render specified professional services; and a statement that the PLLC has one (1) or more qualified persons as members and no disqualified persons as members.

An LLC organized under a general law of this state whose articles have not been repealed by chapters 201-248 of this title may elect professional LLC status by amending its articles to comply with subsection (a) and § 48-248-301.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2000, ch. 587, § 1.

48-248-104. Purposes.

Except to the extent authorized by subsection (b), an LLC may elect professional LLC status under § 48-248-103 solely for the purpose of rendering professional services (including services ancillary to them) and solely within a single profession.

An LLC may elect professional LLC status under § 48-248-103(b) for the purpose of rendering professional services within two (2) or more professions, and for the purpose of engaging in any lawful business authorized by chapters 201-248 of this title, only if the combination of professional purposes or of professional and business purposes is specifically authorized by the licensing law of this state applicable to each profession in the combination.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), if an LLC is formed to provide professional services in states other than Tennessee, such LLC may elect professional LLC status under § 48-248-103 for the purpose of rendering professional service or services as permitted by the licensing boards of the states in which it will operate. Such PLLC shall, nevertheless, be required to file reports and other information as may be required by the applicable licensing boards of Tennessee to establish or confirm that the PLLC is not providing professional services in Tennessee.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 90.